Illinois, session 104th, HB267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Protecting Reproductive Health Care 5Services Act is amended by changing Section 29-5 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 126/29-5)7    Sec. 29-5. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Protecting Reproductive Health Care Services Act. 9References in this Article to "this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.)